Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Actions Other Than Those Relating to Real Property

413.080.
Action upon equity of redemption in personal property.

After a mortgagee of personal property or any person claiming under him has had five (5) years’ continued adverse possession, no action shall be brought by the mortgagor or any person claiming under him to redeem the property.

History.

2540.

413.090.
Action upon judgment, contract, or bond — Fifteen-year limitation — Action for child support arrearages — Time to commence action tolled until obligations cease as to last child on order.

Except as provided in KRS

396.205

,

413.110

,

413.220

,

413.230

and

413.240

, the following actions shall be commenced within fifteen (15) years after the cause of action first accrued:

An action upon a judgment or decree of any court of this state or of the United States, or of any state or territory thereof, the period to be computed from the date of the last execution thereon;

An action upon a recognizance, bond, or written contract , except that actions upon written contracts executed after July 15, 2014, shall be governed by KRS

413.160

;

An action upon the official bond of a sheriff, marshal, clerk, constable, or any other public officer, or any commissioner, receiver, curator, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or trustee appointed by a court or authority of law;

An action upon an appeal bond or bond given on a supersedeas, attachment, injunction, order of arrest or for the delivery of property or for the forthcoming of property, or to obey or perform an order or judgment of court in an action, or upon a bond for costs, or any other bond taken by a court or judge or by an officer pursuant to the directions of a court or judge, in an action or after judgment or decree, or upon a replevin, sale, or delivery bond taken under execution or decree, upon an indemnifying bond taken under a statute, or upon a bond to suspend a proceeding, or upon a bond or obligation for the payment of money or property or for the performance of any undertaking; and

An action to recover unpaid child support arrearages, which may be initiated as one (1) cumulative action for all child support arrearages owed under a court order, with the time to commence an action under this subsection being tolled until all current child support obligations cease as to the last child covered by that order.

History.

2514: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 417, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 130, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 90, § 30, effective July 15, 1988; 2008, ch. 21, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

413.100.
Lienee not to extend limitation as against purchasers or creditors — Exception.

No promise, acknowledgment or payment of money by any person bound on any bond or obligation for the payment of money secured by a lien shall operate as a prolongation or extension of the time within which the lien may be enforced as against purchasers or creditors, unless the promisor and the holder of the lien, before fifteen (15) years after the maturity of the debt, enters a memorandum on the margin of the record of the deed or mortgage, attested by the clerk, showing that the debt is extended, for what time it is extended and the amount still due thereon. The payee shall pay the clerk a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for his services.

History.

2514: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 255, § 37, effective January 1, 2007.

413.110.
Action against county on bonded obligation — Three year limitation — Action on state warrant — Two year limitation.

A cause of action existing against a county by virtue of its bonded obligation for the payment of money, after the county has in good faith offered to redeem the obligations that have matured by the payment in full of all principal and interest due, expires and becomes ineffective at the end of three (3) years after the offer.

A cause of action for payment of any warrant of the Commonwealth expires and becomes noneffective unless brought within two (2) years after the Commonwealth has in good faith offered to redeem the warrant by payment in full of all interest and principal due.

History.

2514: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 270.

413.120.
Actions to be brought within five years.

The following actions shall be commenced within five (5) years after the cause of action accrued:

An action upon a contract not in writing, express or implied.

An action upon a liability created by statute, when no other time is fixed by the statute creating the liability.

An action for a penalty or forfeiture when no time is fixed by the statute prescribing it.

An action for trespass on real or personal property.

An action for the profits of or damages for withholding real or personal property.

An action for an injury to the rights of the plaintiff, not arising on contract and not otherwise enumerated.

An action upon a bill of exchange, check, draft or order, or any endorsement thereof, or upon a promissory note, placed upon the footing of a bill of exchange.

An action to enforce the liability of a steamboat or other vessel.

An action upon a merchant’s account for goods sold and delivered, or any article charged in such store account.

An action upon an account concerning the trade of merchandise, between merchant and merchant or their agents.

An action for relief or damages on the ground of fraud or mistake.

An action to enforce the liability of bail.

An action for personal injuries suffered by any person against the builder of a home or other improvements. This cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time of original occupancy of the improvements which the builder caused to be erected.

HISTORY:

2515, 2518: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 124, § 1; 1988, ch. 224, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 196, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 121, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

413.125.
Actions relating to personal property to be brought within two years.

An action for the taking, detaining or injuring of personal property, including an action for specific recovery shall be commenced within two (2) years from the time the cause of action accrued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 5, effective July 15, 1988.

413.130.
When certain actions in KRS 413.120 accrue.

In every action upon a merchants’ account as described in subsection (9) of KRS

413.120

, the limitation shall be computed from January 1 next succeeding the respective dates of the delivery of the several articles charged in the account. Judgment shall be rendered for no more than the amount of articles actually charged or delivered within five (5) years preceding that in which the action was brought. If any merchant willfully postdates any article charged in such account, or the receipt for the delivery of it, he shall forfeit ten (10) times the amount of the article postdated, to be credited against the account. This credit shall be allowed in an action on the account, without any written pleadings setting it up.

In an action to recover a balance due upon a mutual open and current account concerning the trade of merchandise between merchant and merchant or their agents, as described in subsection (10) of KRS

413.120

, where there have been reciprocal demands between the parties, the cause of action is deemed to have accrued from the time of the last item proved in the account claimed, or proved to be chargeable on the adverse side.

In an action for relief or damages for fraud or mistake, referred to in subsection (11) of KRS

413.120

, the cause of action shall not be deemed to have accrued until the discovery of the fraud or mistake. However, the action shall be commenced within ten (10) years after the time of making the contract or the perpetration of the fraud.

HISTORY:

2518 to 2520; 1998, ch. 196, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 121, § 4, effective June 24, 2015.

413.135.
Action for damages arising out of injury.

No action to recover damages, whether based upon contract or sounding in tort, resulting from or arising out of any deficiency in the construction components, design, planning, supervision, inspection, or construction of any improvement to real property, or for any injury to property, either real or personal, arising out of such deficiency, or for injury to the person or for wrongful death arising out of any such deficiency, shall be brought against any person after the expiration of seven (7) years following the substantial completion of such improvement.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in the case of such an injury to property or the person or wrongful death resulting from such injury, which injury occurred during the seventh year following substantial completion of such improvement, an action to recover damages for such injury or wrongful death may only be brought within one (1) year from the date upon which such injury occurred (irrespective of the date of death), but in no event may such an action be brought more than eight (8) years after the substantial completion of construction of such improvement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as extending the period prescribed by statute for the bringing of any action for damages.

As used in this section, the term “person” shall mean an individual, corporation, partnership, business trust, unincorporated association, or joint stock company; the term “substantial completion” shall be construed to mean the date upon which the owner of the structure, project, or facility first entered upon the occupancy or commenced the use thereof.

History.

Enact. 1966, ch. 246, § 1; 1986, ch. 479, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 425, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

413.137.
Action for damages for injury or illness suffered as a result of female genital mutilation.

A civil action for recovery of damages for injury or illness suffered as a result of female genital mutilation as defined in KRS

508.125

shall be brought within ten (10) years:

Of the procedure being performed; or

After the victim attains the age of eighteen (18) years.

The court may award actual, compensatory, and punitive damages, and any other appropriate relief.

Treble damages may be awarded if the plaintiff proves the defendant’s acts were willful and malicious.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 74, § 5, effective April 2, 2020.

413.140.
Actions to be brought within one year.

The following actions shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of action accrued:

An action for an injury to the person of the plaintiff, or of her husband, his wife, child, ward, apprentice, or servant;

An action for injuries to persons, cattle, or other livestock by railroads or other corporations, with the exception of hospitals licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216;

An action for malicious prosecution, conspiracy, arrest, seduction, criminal conversation, or breach of promise of marriage;

An action for libel or slander;

An action against a physician, surgeon, dentist, or hospital licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216, for negligence or malpractice;

A civil action, arising out of any act or omission in rendering, or failing to render, professional services for others, whether brought in tort or contract, against a real estate appraiser holding a certificate or license issued under KRS Chapter 324A or a real estate broker or sales associate holding a license issued under KRS Chapter 324;

An action for the escape of a prisoner, arrested or imprisoned on civil process;

An action for the recovery of usury paid for the loan or forbearance of money or other thing, against the loaner or forbearer or assignee of either;

An action for the recovery of stolen property, by the owner thereof against any person having the same in his possession;

An action for the recovery of damages or the value of stolen property, against the thief or any accessory;

An action arising out of a detention facility disciplinary proceeding, whether based upon state or federal law;

An action for damages arising out of a deficiency, defect, omission, error, or miscalculation in any survey or plat, whether brought in tort or contract, against a licensed professional land surveyor holding a license under KRS Chapter 322;

An action for violating KRS

311.782

; and

An action for violating KRS

311.731

.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time the injury is first discovered or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered; provided that such action shall be commenced within five (5) years from the date on which the alleged negligent act or omission is said to have occurred.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (f) or (l) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue within one (1) year from the date of the occurrence or from the date when the cause of action was, or reasonably should have been, discovered by the party injured.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time of payment. This limitation shall apply to all payments made on all demands, whether evidenced by writing or existing only in parol.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time the property is found by its owner.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (j) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time of discovery of the liability.

In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue on the date an appeal of the disciplinary proceeding is decided by the institutional warden.

In respect to the action referred to in subsection (1)(m) and (n) of this section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue after the performance or inducement or attempt to perform or induce the abortion.

History.

2516, 2517, 2553: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 20, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 98; 2000, ch. 309, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2013, ch. 48, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 5, § 10, effective January 9, 2017; 2019 ch. 37, § 7, effective March 19, 2019; 2019 ch. 135, § 10, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by
2019 Ky. Acts chs. 37 and
135, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(3/19/2019).
2019 Ky. Acts ch. 37, sec. 8, provides that
2019 Ky. Acts ch. 37 may be cited as the “Human Rights of the Unborn Child and Anti-Discrimination Act.” This statute was amended in Section 7 of that Act.

413.150.
Actions by the Commonwealth.

The limitations prescribed in this chapter shall apply to actions brought by or in the name of the Commonwealth the same as to actions by private persons, except where a different time is prescribed by statute.

History.

2523.

413.160.
Actions upon written contract or not provided for by statute — Ten-year limitation.

An action upon a written contract executed after July 15, 2014, unless otherwise provided by statute, and an action for relief not provided for by statute can only be commenced within ten (10) years after the cause of action accrued.

History.

2522: amend. 2014, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

413.170.
Limitations of actions in KRS 413.090 to 413.160 do not run until removal of disability or death.

If a person entitled to bring any action mentioned in KRS

413.090

to

413.160

, except for a penalty or forfeiture, was, at the time the cause of action accrued, an infant or of unsound mind, the action may be brought within the same number of years after the removal of the disability or death of the person, whichever happens first, allowed to a person without the disability to bring the action after the right accrued.

The right of action upon the official bond of a guardian, personal representative, curator, of the sheriff, or the officer acting as personal representative, or of any other person receiving and holding money to be distributed to a ward, distributee or devisee, under the order of court or by authority of law, of a ward, distributee, devisee or other person entitled, who was an infant when the bond was executed, shall not be deemed to have accrued, unless otherwise expressed in the bond, before the plaintiff attained the age of twenty-one (21) years. Where there are several wards, or several distributees or devisees or other beneficiaries secured by the same bond, who, or some of whom, were infants when the bond was given, the right of action of each one (1) of such infants shall not be deemed to have accrued before he attained the age of twenty-one (21) years.

History.

2521, 2525.

413.180.
Action by or against personal representative under KRS 413.090 to 413.160.

If a person entitled to bring any action mentioned in KRS

413.090

to

413.160

dies before the expiration of the time limited for its commencement and the cause of action survives, the action may be brought by his personal representative after the expiration of that time, if commenced within one (1) year after the qualification of the representative.

If a person dies before the time at which the right to bring any action mentioned in KRS

413.090

to

413.160

would have accrued to him if he had continued alive, and there is an interval of more than one (1) year between his death and the qualification of his personal representative, that representative, for purposes of this chapter, shall be deemed to have qualified on the last day of the one-year period.

History.

2526 to 2528: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 4; 1988, ch. 90, § 27, effective July 15, 1988.

413.190.
Result of absence from the state or obstruction of action under KRS 413.090 to 413.160.

If, at the time any cause of action mentioned in KRS

413.090

to

413.160

accrues against a resident of this state, he is absent from it, the period limited for the commencement of the action against him shall be computed from the time of his return to this state.

When a cause of action mentioned in KRS

413.090

to

413.160

accrues against a resident of this state, and he by absconding or concealing himself or by any other indirect means obstructs the prosecution of the action, the time of the continuance of the absence from the state or obstruction shall not be computed as any part of the period within which the action shall be commenced. But this saving shall not prevent the limitation from operating in favor of any other person not so acting, whether he is a necessary party to the action or not.

History.

2531, 2532.

413.200.
Action against personal representative who has settled accounts. [Repealed.]

413.210.
Action against heirs and personal representative when estate divided. [Repealed.]

413.220.
Sureties who are discharged after seven years.

A surety shall be discharged from all liability under any judgment or decree, after the lapse of seven (7) years without the issue of execution and prosecution in good faith for collection.

A surety in any bond given in the course of any judicial proceeding shall be discharged from all liability on it unless suit is brought on it within seven (7) years after the cause of action accrues.

A surety in any obligation or contract, other than those provided for in KRS

413.230

, shall be discharged from all liability on it unless suit is brought on it within seven (7) years after the cause of action accrues.

History.

2548, 2549, 2551.

413.230.
Sureties who are discharged after five years.

A surety for an executor, administrator, guardian or curator, or for a sheriff to whom a decedent’s estate has been transferred, shall be discharged from all liability to a distributee, devisee or ward when five (5) years have elapsed without suit after the cause of action accrued, and after the devisee, distributee or ward attained full age. But the failure of one to commence action in time shall not affect the right of another.

History.

2550: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 7; 1980, ch. 259, § 28, effective July 15, 1980.

413.240.
Action against surety — When limitation does not run.

The limitations given in KRS

413.220

and

413.230

shall not apply to the time elapsed when there was no executor, administrator or other person authorized to commence an action, nor to the six (6) months during which an action cannot be brought against a personal representative, nor to any delay assented to by the surety in writing. If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff in any case provided for in those sections and it is afterwards reversed or arrested so that the plaintiff takes nothing by it, he may commence another action within one (1) year thereafter. If the surety absconds, conceals himself or by removal from the state or otherwise, obstructs or hinders his being sued the time of such obstruction shall not be counted as part of the time of limitation allowed by those sections. If the judgment is obstructed by appeal, supersedeas or injunction the time of such obstruction shall also be disallowed.

History.

2552.

413.241.
Legislative finding — Limitation on liability of licensed sellers or servers of intoxicating beverages — Liability of intoxicated person.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the consumption of intoxicating beverages, rather than the serving, furnishing, or sale of such beverages, is the proximate cause of any injury, including death and property damage, inflicted by an intoxicated person upon himself or another person.

Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, no person holding a permit under KRS Chapters 241 to 244, nor any agent, servant, or employee of the person, who sells or serves intoxicating beverages to a person over the age for the lawful purchase thereof, shall be liable to that person or to any other person or to the estate, successors, or survivors of either for any injury suffered off the premises including but not limited to wrongful death and property damage, because of the intoxication of the person to whom the intoxicating beverages were sold or served, unless a reasonable person under the same or similar circumstances should know that the person served is already intoxicated at the time of serving.

The intoxicated person shall be primarily liable with respect to injuries suffered by third persons.

The limitation of liability provided by this section shall not apply to any person who causes or contributes to the consumption of alcoholic beverages by force or by falsely representing that a beverage contains no alcohol.

This section shall not apply to civil actions filed prior to July 15, 1988.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 434, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 121, § 36, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 121, § 103, effective June 25, 2013.

413.242.
Prerequisite to action against purchaser or selling agent of equine interest.

Before a party possessing a security interest or lien against an equine interest that has been sold without the debt to the party being discharged may bring an action against the purchaser or selling agent of the equine interest, the secured party shall pursue a remedy against the debtor to the point where a judgment is rendered on the merits or the suit is dismissed with prejudice.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 408, § 184, effective July 1, 2001.

413.243.
“Professional services” defined.

As used in KRS

413.245

, “professional services” means any service rendered in a profession required to be licensed, administered and regulated as professions in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, except those professions governed by KRS

413.140

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 159, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

413.245.
Actions arising out of the rendering, or failure to render, professional services to others.

Notwithstanding any other prescribed limitation of actions which might otherwise appear applicable, except those provided in KRS

413.140

, a civil action, whether brought in tort or contract, arising out of any act or omission in rendering, or failing to render, professional services for others shall be brought within one (1) year from the date of the occurrence or from the date when the cause of action was, or reasonably should have been, discovered by the party injured. Time shall not commence against a party under legal disability until removal of the disability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 159, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

413.246.
Action for damages based on professional services rendered by licensed home inspector.

An action for damages, whether brought in contract or tort, or on any other basis, based on professional services that were rendered or that should have been rendered by a licensed home inspector under KRS

198B.700

to

198B.738

shall not be brought, commenced, or maintained unless the action is filed within one (1) year of the time that the claimant knew or should have known of a deficient inspection and damages and injuries resulting therefrom.

Nothing in this section creates any duty to a third party that is not available under common law.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 100, § 10, effective July 15, 2008.

413.247.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 304, § 1, effective April 2, 1982; repealed by 2017 ch. 19, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

413.248.
Liability of donor for damages resulting from condition of donated food. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 304, § 2, effective April 2, 1982; 2006, ch. 64, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; repealed by 2017 ch. 19, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

413.2485.
Action relating to injury to or illness of an adult as a result of a sexual offense.

As used in this section, “injury or illness” means either a physical or psychological injury or illness.

A civil action for recovery of damages for an injury or illness suffered as a result of an act or series of acts against a person eighteen (18) years old or older that meets the criteria of KRS

510.040

,

510.050

,

510.060

,

510.070

,

510.080

,

510.090

,

510.110

,

510.120

,

510.130

,

510.140

,

510.150

,

529.100

where the offense involves commercial sexual activity,

529.110

where the offense involves commercial sexual activity,

530.020

,

531.090

, or

531.100

, shall be brought before whichever of the following periods last expires:

Within five (5) years of the act or the last of a series of acts by the same perpetrator;

Within five (5) years of the date the victim knew, or should have known, of the act;

Within five (5) years upon knowledge or identity of the perpetrator; or

Within five (5) years of the conviction of a civil defendant for KRS

510.040

,

510.050

,

510.060

,

510.070

,

510.080

,

510.090

,

510.110

,

510.120

,

510.130

,

510.140

,

510.150

,

529.100

where the offense involves commercial sexual activity,

529.110

where the offense involves commercial sexual activity,

530.020

,

531.090

, or

531.100

.

No prior criminal prosecution or conviction of the civil defendant for the act or series of acts shall be required to bring a civil action under this section for redress of an injury or illness.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 114, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

413.249.
Action relating to childhood sexual abuse or childhood sexual assault.

As used in this section:

“Childhood sexual assault or abuse” means an act or series of acts against a person less than eighteen (18) years old and which meets the criteria defining a misdemeanor or felony in:

KRS Chapter 510;

KRS

529.040

when the defendant advances or profits from the prostitution of a minor;

KRS

529.100

when the offense involves commercial sexual activity;

KRS

529.110

when the offense involves commercial sexual activity;

KRS

530.020

or 530.064(1)(a);

KRS Chapter 531 involving a minor or depiction of a minor; or

KRS

506.010

or

506.030

for attempt to commit or solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to 6. of this paragraph.

No prior criminal prosecution or conviction of the civil defendant for the act or series of acts shall be required to bring a civil action for redress of childhood sexual assault or abuse;

“Entity” means a firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, association, or any private or public entity, including the Commonwealth, a city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county government, or any of their agencies, departments, or any KRS

58.180

nonprofit nonstock corporation; and

“Injury or illness” means either a physical or psychological injury or illness.

A civil action for recovery of damages for injury or illness suffered as a result of childhood sexual assault or abuse shall be brought before whichever of the following periods last expires:

Within ten (10) years of the commission of the act or the last of a series of acts by the same perpetrator;

Within ten (10) years of the date the victim knew, or should have known, of the act;

Within ten (10) years after the victim attains the age of eighteen (18) years; or

Within ten (10) years of the conviction of a civil defendant for an offense included in the definition of childhood sexual assault or abuse.

The time periods set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to a civil action for recovery of damages for injury or illness against;

A person alleged to have committed the act of childhood sexual assault or abuse; or

An entity that owed a duty of care to the plaintiff, where a wrongful or negligent act by an employee, officer, director, official, volunteer, representative, or agent of the entity was a legal cause of the childhood sexual assault or abuse that resulted in the injury to the plaintiff.

If a complaint is filed alleging that an act of childhood sexual assault or abuse occurred more than ten (10) years prior to the date that the action is commenced, the complaint shall be accompanied by a motion to seal the record and the complaint shall immediately be sealed by the clerk of the court. The complaint shall remain sealed until:

The court rules upon the motion to seal;

Any motion to dismiss under CR 12.02 is ruled upon, and if the complaint is dismissed, the complaint and any related papers or pleadings shall remain sealed unless opened by a higher court; or

The defendant files an answer and a motion to seal the record upon grounds that a valid factual defense exists, to be raised in a motion for summary judgment pursuant to CR 56. The record shall remain sealed by the clerk until the court rules upon the defendant’s motion to close the record. If the court grants the motion to close, the record shall remain sealed until the defendant’s motion for summary judgment is granted. The complaint, motions, and other related papers or pleadings shall remain sealed unless opened by a higher court.

A victim of childhood sexual assault or abuse shall not have a cause of action against a third party, unless the third party failed to act as a reasonable person or entity in complying with their duties to the victim. If a victim of childhood sexual assault or abuse has a cause of action under this section, the cause of action shall be commenced within the time period set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for excluding evidence regarding childhood sexual assault or abuse or the cause thereof when an exception to the Kentucky Rules of Evidence is met, in any judicial proceeding. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding in District or Circuit Court regarding childhood sexual assault or abuse.

As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the clergy-penitent privilege is limited to information received solely through confidential communications with a clergy member, privately or in a confessional setting, when in the course of the discipline or practice of the clergy member’s church, denomination, or organization, he or she is authorized or accustomed to hearing those communications, and under the discipline, tenets, customs, or practices of his or her church, denomination, or organization, has a duty to keep those communications secret.

As was its intention with the passage of 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 114, sec. 2, the General Assembly hereby states that the amendments enacted in 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 114, sec. 2 shall be applied retroactively to actions accruing before its effective date of June 29, 2017. This section is a remedial statute which is to be given the most liberal interpretation to provide remedies for victims of childhood sexual assault or abuse.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any claim for childhood sexual assault or abuse that was barred as of March 23, 2021 because the applicable statute of limitations had expired is hereby revived, and the action may be brought if commenced within five (5) years of the date on which the applicable statute of limitations expired.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 577, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 19, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 25, § 20, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 114, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 89, § 2, effective March 23, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Subsection (1) of this section was amended in 1986 Acts Ch. 479, Section 1, to extend the period of time in which certain actions may be brought from five to seven years. Inadvertently, when the period of time was extended by committee amendment, subsection (2) was not amended to conform. Pursuant to
KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has made a technical correction in order to make the subsections consistent.